Utah statutes.
58-1-108.   Adjudicative proceedings.
(1)  The division and all boards created under the authority of this title
shall comply with the procedures and requirements of Title 13, Chapter 1,
Department of Commerce, and Title 63G, Chapter 4, Administrative Procedures
Act, in all of their adjudicative proceedings as defined by Subsection
63G-4-103(1).
(2)  Before proceeding under Section 63G-4-502, the division shall review the
proposed action with a committee of no less than three licensees appointed by
the chairman of the licensing board created under this title for the
profession of the person against whom the action is proposed.
(3)  Notwithstanding Title 63G, Chapter 4, Administrative Procedures Act, a
warning or final disposition letter which does not constitute disciplinary
action against the addressee, issued in response to a complaint of
unprofessional or unlawful conduct under this title, does not constitute an
adjudicative proceeding.
